Montana, session 2025, HB474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 53-6-149, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-6-149. State special revenue fund account -- administration. (1) There is a hospital medicaid
reimbursement account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102.
(2) All money collected under 15-66-102[, except for the money deposited pursuant to 15-66-
102(3)(b) into the Montana HELP Act special revenue account provided for in 53-6-1315,] must be deposited in
the account.
(3) Money in the account must be used by the department of public health and human services to
provide funding [no later than May 5 of each year] no later than May 15 of each year for increases in medicaid
payments to hospitals and for the costs of collection of the fee and other administrative activities associated
with the implementation of increases in the medicaid payments to hospitals. (Bracketed language terminates
June 30, 2025, on occurrence of contingency--sec. 48, Ch. 415, L. 2019.)"
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 474
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 474, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 474
INTRODUCED BY J. GILLETTE
AN ACT REVISING THE DATE FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO
PROVIDE ANNUAL FUNDING FOR INCREASES IN SUPPLEMENTAL MEDICAID PAYMENTS TO
HOSPITALS; AMENDING SECTION 53-6-149, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”